Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 15 Water Supply

39-15-1.
Power of condemnation for water supply purposes — Changes in highways.

Whenever the electors of any town, qualified to vote upon questions of taxation or involving the expenditure of money, shall have voted, at a town meeting called for that purpose, to provide a water supply for the inhabitants of the town, or for some part thereof; or whenever any town shall enter or shall have entered into any contract with any person or corporation to furnish the town with a water supply (a contract which towns are hereby authorized to make), then the town, or the person or corporation bound to fulfill the contract, as the case may be, may take, condemn, hold, use, and permanently appropriate any land, water, rights of water and of way, necessary and proper to be used in furnishing or enlarging any such water supply, including sites and materials for dams, reservoirs, pumping stations, and for coal houses, with a right-of-way thereto, and a right-of-way for water pipes along and across public highways, and through private lands, and including also lands covered or to be flowed by water, or to be in any other way used in furnishing, enlarging, or maintaining any water supply. And if any change in any highway shall be required for the accommodation of the water supply, then the town, person, or corporation may alter the grade of the highway or construct a bridge therein, under the direction of the town council of the town where the change is made, and as far as may be needful, first giving bond with surety satisfactory to a justice of the superior court, if requested, conditioned to reimburse the town for every expense and damage occasioned by a change of grade or other change in the highway.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 123, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1223; G.L. 1909, ch. 149, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 179, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 637, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-1

.

39-15-2.
Payment for property taken.

Whenever any property or estate or rights of property shall be taken under the provisions of §

39-15-1

, the owner thereof, including all persons having property rights therein, shall be paid therefor according to their respective interests, by the town, person, or corporation, taking the property or estate or rights of property.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 123, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 149, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 179, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 637, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-2

.

39-15-3.
Riparian rights as to tidelands.

If any land covered by tidewater shall be taken under this chapter, then damages to the rights of every riparian owner and of every lessee of the land, if any, shall be awarded under the provisions hereof the same as for any other right of property.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 123, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 149, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 179, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 637, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-3

.

39-15-4.
Bond to pay damages for property taken.

Whenever any property or estate or rights of property shall be taken under the provisions of this chapter for either of the purposes described in §

39-15-2

or §

39-15-3

, and the person or corporation shall then, or at any time thereafter, be required by the owner of the property, estate, or right taken, to give bond with surety for the payment therefor, the person or corporation shall, without delay, give bond to the owner, with surety satisfactory to a justice of the superior court, conditioned to pay to the owner all damages that may be awarded him or her for the estate so taken.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 123, § 3; C.P.A. 1905, § 1223; G.L. 1909, ch. 149, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 179, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 637, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-4

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 117.

39-15-5.
Plat and description of property condemned.

The town, person, or corporation taking any property, estate, or right of property under the provisions of this chapter, shall first cause a plat with a description thereof to be made, which, with a certificate of the taking of the property, estate, or right of property, shall contain a list of the owners thereof and of the persons interested therein, so far as the owners or person interested therein may be known to the town, person, or corporation taking the property, estate, or right of property, and which shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court for the county where the property or estate is located.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 123, § 4; C.P.A. 1905, § 1222; G.L. 1909, ch. 149, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 179, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 637, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-5

.

39-15-6.
Notice of condemnation proceedings.

Upon the filing of any certificate, the clerk shall forthwith issue a notice to the several persons named in the certificate which shall contain the substance of the certificate, and also a notice of a time and place when the persons may appear in the court and be heard in reference to the necessity for the taking and the appointment of commissioners to appraise the damages accruing to them by virtue of the taking of their property, estate, or rights of property; and the clerk shall, for four (4) successive weeks thereafter, cause to be advertised in each issue of some newspaper published in the county a copy of the notice, requiring all persons interested in the premises to appear at the time and place, if they see fit, to be heard in the premises. The personal notice upon known parties shall be served as soon as may be, and at least twenty (20) days, before the time of the hearing, by some officer authorized to serve process or by some disinterested person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 123, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 149, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 179, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 637, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-6

.

39-15-7.
Hearing on condemnation — Commissioners to appraise damages — Award.

At the time mentioned in the notice given under the authority of §

39-15-6

, or at such adjournment from the time as the court shall order, the court, after hearing the parties in interest therein who may desire to be heard, shall first adjudge whether the taking of the property, estate, or rights in question is a public necessity, and, if that shall be adjudged affirmatively, the property and rights of property shall from that time be deemed to have been taken, and the court shall then appoint three (3) suitable persons to be commissioners to appraise the damages sustained by any person whose property, estate, or rights of property shall have been taken for either or any of the purposes authorized in this chapter. The commissioners, after being duly sworn to the faithful discharge of their trust and giving due notice to the parties in interest, shall proceed to hear the parties with their allegations and proofs, and to examine the premises, and shall make up and return their award in the premises to the clerk of the superior court from which they received their appointment, with their fees marked thereon, which fees, being first allowed by the court, shall be forthwith paid by the town, person, or corporation taking the property, estate, or rights of property embraced in the award.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 123, § 5; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 149, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 179, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 637, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-7

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 117.

39-15-8.
Jury trial on damages.

Upon the payment of the fees provided in §

39-15-7

, the clerk of the superior court shall open the report of the commissioners, and the report may be examined by any person interested in the report. Any person or party aggrieved by any award of damages by the commissioners may claim a jury trial upon any item of damages thereby awarded, and may file his or her claim for the trial at any time within three (3) months from the opening of the report. The claim shall stand for trial by jury upon a proper issue based upon the claim, as other cases upon the docket of the court, and shall be tried in the court in every respect as other cases are there tried, including the right to object to rulings and to move for new trials for cause; and execution may be awarded thereon as in other cases; but if the party claiming the jury trial shall not therein obtain an award for damages more favorable to him or her than that given by the commissioners, he or she shall pay costs to the adverse party.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 123, § 6; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 149, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 179, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 637, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-8

.

39-15-9.
Judgment on award or verdict.

Whenever the report of the commissioners shall be received by the court and no right of trial by jury shall be claimed thereon, the court shall enter judgment in favor of the several claimants for the damages awarded to them respectively; and so shall enter judgment upon the verdict of the jury, subject to the right to apply for new trials for cause, upon the rendition of the verdict; and the court shall forthwith grant execution upon all such judgments.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 123, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 149, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 179, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 637, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-9

.

39-15-10.
Amendment of proceedings.

Any proceeding in taking any property or estate or rights of property, or in claiming damages therefor, or other proceeding under the provisions of this chapter, may at any stage of the proceeding, with the leave of the court, be amended upon such terms and conditions as to the court may appear to be just and proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 123, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 149, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 179, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 637, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-10

.

39-15-11.
Grant of right to lay pipes and build reservoirs — Exemption from taxation.

The town council of any town or the city council of any city may grant to any person or corporation the right to lay water pipes in any of the public highways of the town or city for supplying the inhabitants of the town or city with water, and may consent to the erection, construction, and the right to maintain a reservoir or reservoirs within the town or city, for such time and upon such terms and conditions as they may deem proper, including therein, the power and authority to exempt the pipes and reservoirs and the land and works connected therewith from taxation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 40, § 37; G.L. 1909, ch. 50, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 51, § 42; G.L. 1938, ch. 333, § 42; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-11

.

39-15-12.
Liability of landowner for water charges — Lien.

The owner of any house, building, tenement, or estate shall be liable for the payment of the price or rent or rates fixed by any town, city, or incorporated fire district or water district for the use of water furnished by such town, city, fire district, or water district to the owner or occupant of the house, building, tenement, or estate; and the price, rent, or rates shall be a lien upon the house, building, tenement, and estate in the same way and manner as taxes assessed on real estate are liens, and, if not paid as required by the town, city, fire district, or water district, shall be collected in the same manner that taxes assessed on real estate are by law collected; provided, however, that the city of Cranston or any agency thereof may charge interest on delinquent payments at a rate of not more than twelve percent (12%) per annum; provided, however, that the city of Woonsocket or any agency thereof may charge interest on delinquent payments at a rate of not more than eighteen percent (18%) per annum.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 428, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 449, § 1; P.L. 1940, ch. 949, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-15-12

; P.L. 1982, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 343, § 1.